Utah statutes.
17-21-9.   Indexing of deeds and other instruments.
Deeds and other instruments affecting real estate made by a United States
marshal, a sheriff, master in chancery, special commissioner, executor,
administrator, guardian, trustee, or other person acting in behalf of another
shall be indexed in the name of the person whose land is sold or affected as
grantor.
